Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.057

Disciplining authority—Duties—Documents.

(1) A disciplining authority shall provide a person or entity making a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.080 with a reasonable opportunity to supplement or amend the contents of the complaint or report. The license holder must be provided an opportunity to respond to any supplemental or amended complaint or report. The disciplining authority shall promptly respond to inquiries made by the license holder or the person or entity making a complaint or report regarding the status of the complaint or report.

(2)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW, following completion of an investigation or closure of a report or complaint, the disciplining authority shall, upon request, provide the license holder or the person or entity making the complaint or report with a copy of the file relating to the complaint or report, including, but not limited to, any response submitted by the license holder under RCW 18.130.095(1).

(b) The disciplining authority may not disclose documents in the file that:

(i) Contain confidential or privileged information regarding a patient other than the person making the complaint or report; or

(ii) Contain information exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(c) The exemptions in (b) of this subsection are inapplicable to the extent that the relevant information can be deleted from the documents in question.

(d) The disciplining authority may impose a reasonable charge for copying the file consistent with the charges allowed for copying public records under RCW 42.56.120.

(3)(a) Prior to any final decision on any disciplinary proceeding before a disciplining authority, the disciplining authority shall provide the person submitting the complaint or report or his or her representative, if any, an opportunity to be heard through an oral or written impact statement about the effect of the person's injury on the person and his or her family and on a recommended sanction.

(b) If the license holder is not present at the disciplinary proceeding, the disciplining authority shall transmit the impact statement to the license holder, who shall certify to the disciplining authority that he or she has received it.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, representatives of the person submitting the complaint or report include his or her family members and such other affected parties as may be designated by the disciplining authority upon request.

(4) A disciplining authority shall inform, in writing, the license holder and person or entity submitting the complaint or report of the final disposition of the complaint or report.

(5)(a) If the disciplining authority closes a complaint or report prior to issuing a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090 or a statement of allegations under RCW 18.130.172, the person or entity submitting the report may, within thirty days of receiving notice under subsection (4) of this section, request the disciplining authority to reconsider the closure of the complaint or report on the basis of new information relating to the original complaint or report. A request for reconsideration made under this subsection may only be brought in relation to the original complaint and may only be brought one time.

(b) The disciplining authority shall, within thirty days of receiving the request for reconsideration, notify the license holder of the request and the new information providing the basis therefor. The license holder has thirty days to provide a response. The disciplining authority shall notify the person or entity and the license holder in writing of its final decision on the request for reconsideration, including an explanation of the reasoning behind the decision.

[ 2011 c 157 s 1.]